Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1722
Share account, defined.

Share account shall mean a balance held by a credit union and established by a member in accordance with standards specified by the credit union, including balances designated as shares, share certificates, share draft accounts, or other names. Share account shall not include membership shares.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 22.